Hawaii statutes.
[§321-352.2] Early language
services for children who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind. Early
intervention services for infants and toddlers may include, but not be limited
to, service providers and mentors of the deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind
who use American Sign Language; service providers and mentors of the deaf who
use oral language; American Sign Language teachers for families of young
children; family-to-family support; and training of early intervention
providers. [L 2016, c 177, §2]

Note

Working group on age-appropriate development for children
from birth to age five years who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind;
reports to 2017-2018 legislature (ceases to exist June 30, 2018). L 2016, c
177, §3.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next